Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 5. Forest Reserve Funds

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Permissible use of public funds for reforestation or forest conservation, 13 ALR2d 1095.

§ 9-4-501.
Money from federal forest reserves; apportionment to counties.

On January 1 of each year, or as soon thereafter as there is any money in the state treasury paid to the state by act of congress, approved June 30, 1906, as amended by act of congress, approved May 23, 1908, or any act amendatory thereto or supplemental thereof, whereby twenty-five percent (25%), or any other proportion, of the money received from each forest reserve in the state is paid to the state to be expended for the benefit of the public schools and public roads of the counties in which the forest reserve is situated, the state treasurer shall apportion the money to the entitled counties in the manner hereinafter described.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 7, § 1; 1909, ch. 23, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 128; C.S. 1920, § 137; R.S. 1931, § 109-408; C.S. 1945, § 18-403; W.S. 1957, § 9-573; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-801; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to distribution of funds received under provisions of Taylor Grazing Act to counties for school purposes, see art. 4 of this chapter.

As to distribution and use of federal government royalties, see art. 6 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

The Act of May 23, 1908, referred to in this section, appears as various sections throughout U.S.C., including 16 U.S.C. § 500, which provides for the payment of moneys from national forests to the state for schools and roads.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1923); State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(1924).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 73.

§ 9-4-502.
Money from federal forest reserves; method of apportionment.

In making the apportionment provided for in W.S.

9-4-501

, the state treasurer shall ascertain the amount which has accrued from each United States forest reserve in the state, and shall apportion the revenue to the counties in which the reserve is located in proportion to the acreage of the reserve within the boundaries of the counties.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 7, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 129; C.S. 1920, § 138; R.S. 1931, § 109-409; C.S. 1945, § 18-404; W.S. 1957, § 9-574; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-802; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1923).

§ 9-4-503.
Money from federal forest reserves; distribution among counties.

Upon making the apportionment provided for in W.S.

9-4-501

through

9-4-504

, the state treasurer shall certify to the state auditor the amounts due to the counties, whereupon the state auditor shall issue a warrant payable from the monies received pursuant to W.S.

9-4-501

, in favor of the county treasurer of the counties included in the distribution for the amount to which the county is entitled and remit the warrants to the county treasurers.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 7, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 130; C.S. 1920, § 139; R.S. 1931, § 109-410; C.S. 1945, § 18-405; W.S. 1957, § 9-575; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-803; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(1924).

§ 9-4-504.
Money from federal forest reserves; distribution by county commissioners.

Upon the receipt by the county treasurer of the funds, as provided in W.S.

9-4-503

, the county commissioners of the county shall apportion the monies between the general school fund and the road fund of their county. Not less than five percent (5%) of the monies shall be credited to either one of the funds.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 7, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 131; Laws 1915, ch. 148, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 140; R.S. 1931, § 109-411; C.S. 1945, § 18-406; W.S. 1957, § 9-576; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-804; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(1924).